en: Communication Radios
xx: Communication Radios
cs: Vysílačky
da: Kommunikationsradioer
de: Funkgeräte
es: Comunicación por radio
fr: Radios de communication
it: Radio di comunicazione
ja: 無線通信
nl: Communicatieradio's
no: Kommunikasjonsradioer
pl: Urządzenia radiowe
pt: Rádios para comunicação
ru: Товары для радиосвязи
sv: Kommunikationsradio
tr: İletişim Telsizleri

en: CB Radios
xx: CB Radios
cs: Vysílačky v občanském pásmu (CB)
da: CB-radioer
de: CB-Funkgeräte
es: Equipos de radioaficionados
fr: Radios CB
it: Radio CB
ja: CB無線
nl: Kortegolfradio's
no: Privatradioer
pl: Radia CB
pt: Rádios CB
ru: СиБи-радио
sv: Privatradioenheter
tr: Halk Bandı Telsizleri

en: Radio Scanners
xx: Radio Scanners
cs: Radioskenery
da: Radioscannere
de: Funkscanner
es: Escáneres de radio
fr: Scanners radio
it: Radioscanner
ja: ラジオ受信機
nl: Radioscanners
no: Radioskannere
pl: Skanery radiowe
pt: Scanners de rádio
ru: Радиосканеры
sv: Radioscanners
tr: Radyo Tarayıcılar

en: Two-Way Radios
xx: Two-Way Radios
cs: Obousměrné vysílačky
da: Tovejsradioer
de: Funksprechgeräte
es: Radios de dos vías
fr: Radios bidirectionnelles
it: Ricetrasmittenti
ja: トランシーバー
nl: Tweewegradio's
no: Toveisradioer
pl: Radia dwukierunkowe
pt: Rádios transmissores-receptores
ru: Приемопередатчики
sv: Radiotelefoner
tr: İki Yönlü Telsizler

en: Intercom Accessories
xx: Intercom Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k domovním telefonům
da: Samtaleanlæg – tilbehør
de: Sprechanlagen-Zubehör
es: Accesorios de intercomunicadores
fr: Accessoires pour interphone
it: Accessori per intercomunicazione
ja: インターホン関連用品
nl: Intercomaccessoires
no: Interkom-tilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do interkomów
pt: Acessórios para comunicação interna
ru: Принадлежности для домофонов
sv: Tillbehör till porttelefon
tr: İnterkom Aksesuarları

en: Intercoms
xx: Intercoms
cs: Domovní telefony
da: Samtaleanlæg
de: Sprechanlagen
es: Intercomunicadores
fr: Interphones
it: Interfoni
ja: インターホン
nl: Intercomsystemen
no: Interkomer
pl: Interkomy
pt: Interfones
ru: Системы двусторонней связи
sv: Porttelefoner
tr: İnterkomlar

en: Pagers
xx: Pagers
cs: Pagery
da: Personsøgere
de: Pager
es: Buscapersonas
fr: Pagers
it: Cercapersone
ja: ポケットベル
nl: Pagers
no: Personsøkere
pl: Pagery
pt: Pagers
ru: Пейджеры
sv: Personsökare
tr: Çağrı Cihazları

en: Telephony
xx: Telephony
cs: Telefony
da: Telefoni
de: Telefone
es: Telefonía
fr: Téléphonie
it: Telefonia
ja: 電話
nl: Telefonie
no: Telefoni
pl: Telefonia
pt: Telefonia
ru: Телефония
sv: Telefoni
tr: Telefon İletişimi

en: Conference Phones
xx: Conference Phones
cs: Konferenční telefony
da: Mødetelefoner
de: Konferenztelefone
es: Teléfonos para conferencias
fr: Téléphones de conférence
it: Telefoni da conferenza
ja: 会議用電話
nl: Vergadertelefoons
no: Konferansetelefoner
pl: Telefony konferencyjne
pt: Telefones para conferência
ru: Телефоны для конференц-связи
sv: Konferenstelefoner
tr: Konferans Telefonları

en: Corded Phones
xx: Corded Phones
cs: Šňůrové telefony
da: Telefoner med ledning
de: Schnurtelefone
es: Teléfonos fijos
fr: Téléphones filaires, Téléphone fixe
it: Telefoni con filo
ja: コード付き電話機
nl: Bedrade telefoons
no: Telefoner med ledning
pl: Telefony przewodowe
pt: Telefones com fio
ru: Проводные телефоны
sv: Telefoner med sladd
tr: Kablolu Telefonlar

en: Cordless Phones
xx: Cordless Phones
cs: Bezšňůrové telefony
da: Telefoner uden ledning
de: Schnurlostelefone
es: Teléfonos inalámbricos
fr: Téléphones sans fil
it: Telefoni cordless
ja: コードレス電話機
nl: Draadloze telefoons
no: Trådløse telefoner
pl: Telefony bezprzewodowe
pt: Telefones sem fio
ru: Беспроводные телефоны
sv: Sladdlösa telefoner
tr: Kablosuz Telefonlar

en: Mobile Phone Accessories
xx: Mobile Phone Accessories
cs: Mobilní telefony – příslušenství
da: Mobiltelefon – tilbehør
de: Mobiltelefonzubehör
es: Accesorios para móviles
fr: Accessoires pour téléphones mobiles
it: Accessori telefoni cellulari
ja: 携帯電話・スマートフォン用アクセサリー
nl: Accessoires voor mobiele telefoons
no: Mobiltelefontilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do telefonów komórkowych
pt: Acessórios para celulares
ru: Принадлежности для мобильных телефонов
sv: Mobiltelefontillbehör
tr: Cep Telefonu Aksesuarları

en: Mobile Phone Camera Accessories
xx: Mobile Phone Camera Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k fotoaparátům mobilních telefonů
da: Objektiver til mobiltelefonkameraer
de: Zubehör für Mobiltelefon-Kameras
es: Accesorios para cámaras de teléfonos móviles
fr: Objectifs de téléphones mobiles
it: Accessori per fotocamere di telefoni cellulari
ja: 携帯電話・スマートフォン内蔵カメラ用アクセサリー
nl: Camera-accessoires voor mobiele telefoons
no: Linser og tilbehør til mobiltelefonkameraer
pl: Akcesoria fotograficzne do telefonów komórkowych
pt: Acessórios para câmera de celular
ru: Принадлежности для камер мобильных телефонов
sv: Linser för mobiltelefonkameror
tr: Cep Telefonu Kamera Lensleri

en: Mobile Phone Cases, Smartphone cases, Phone cases
xx: Mobile Phone Cases
cs: Pouzdra na mobily
da: Mobiltelefon – covers
de: Mobiltelefontaschen
es: Fundas para móviles
fr: Housses pour téléphones mobiles, Coques pour mobiles, protection smart-phone, protection smartphone
it: Custodie cellulari
ja: 携帯電話・スマートフォン用ケース
nl: Hoezen voor mobiele telefoons
no: Deksler og omslag for mobiltelefoner
pl: Futerały na telefony komórkowe
pt: Estojos para telefones celulares
ru: Чехлы для мобильных телефонов
sv: Mobiltelefonfodral
tr: Cep Telefonu Kılıfları

en: Screen protection
fr: Protection d'écran

en: iPhone Cases
fr: Coques pour iPhone, protections pour iPhone

en: Android cases
fr: Coques pour Android, protections pour Android

en: Mobile Phone Charms & Straps
xx: Mobile Phone Charms & Straps
cs: Přívěsky a popruhy na mobilní telefony
da: Mobiltelefon – smykker og vedhæng
de: Handycharms & -anhänger
es: Correas y adornos para móviles
fr: Breloques et dragonnes pour téléphones mobiles
it: Ciondoli/cinghiette per cellulari
ja: 携帯ストラップ
nl: Bedeltjes en bandjes voor mobiele telefoons
no: Amuletter og stropper til mobiltelefoner
pl: Zawieszki i paski do telefonów komórkowych
pt: Amuletos e cordões para celulares
ru: Подвески и ремешки для мобильных телефонов
sv: Smycken och remmar till mobiltelefoner
tr: Cep Telefonu Nazarlık ve Askıları

en: Mobile Phone Pre-Paid Cards & SIM Cards
xx: Mobile Phone Pre-Paid Cards & SIM Cards
cs: SIM karty do mobilních telefonů
da: Mobiltelefon – simkort
de: Handy-Prepaid- & -SIM-Karten
es: Tarjetas SIM y de prepago para teléfonos móviles
fr: Cartes prépayées et cartes SIM pour téléphones mobiles
it: Schede SIM e prepagate per cellulari
ja: 携帯電話・スマートフォン用SIMカード
nl: Simkaarten voor mobiele telefoons
no: Kontantkort og SIM-kort til mobiltelefoner
pl: Karty SIM do telefonów komórkowych
pt: Cartões SIM para celular
ru: SIM-карты для мобильных телефонов
sv: SIM-kort
tr: Cep Telefonu Hazır Kartları ve SIM Kartları

en: Mobile Phone Pre-Paid Cards
xx: Mobile Phone Pre-Paid Cards
cs: Předplacené karty do mobilních telefonů
da: Taletidskort til mobiltelefoner
de: Prepaid-Karten für Mobiltelefone
es: Tarjetas de prepago para teléfonos móviles
fr: Cartes prépayées pour téléphone portable
it: Schede SIM prepagate
ja: 携帯電話・スマートフォン用プリペイドカード
nl: Prepaid simkaarten
no: Kontantkort til mobiltelefon
pl: Karty typu pre-paid do telefonów komórkowych
pt: Chips pré-pagos para celulares
ru: Мобильные телефоны с предоплаченными картами
sv: Kontantkort till mobiltelefoner
tr: Faturasız Cep Telefonu Hatları